California statutes. Education Code
(a) The sum of two hundred ten million one hundred thousand dollars ($210,100,000) is hereby appropriated in the 2010–11 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Controller for allocation to school districts and community college districts for the purpose of offsetting the 2009–10 outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(1) The amount appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 41203.1.

(2) The
 amount allocated to school districts pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed in a manner that reflects the proportion of regular average daily attendance in school districts, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 41209, as those numbers are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which funds are to be received.

(3) The amount annually allocated to community college districts pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed based on enrolled full-time equivalent students, as those numbers are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which funds are to be received.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision a school district includes a county office of education and a charter school.

(b) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amounts appropriated and allocated pursuant to this section shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2009–10 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(c) Funding received by school districts and community college districts pursuant to this section shall first be deemed to be paid in satisfaction of any outstanding claims pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs for any fiscal year. Notwithstanding any amounts that are deemed, pursuant to this subdivision, to be paid in satisfaction of
 outstanding claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs, the Controller may audit any claim as allowed by law and may reduce any amount owed by school districts and community college districts pursuant to an audit by reducing amounts owed for any other mandate claims. The Controller shall apply amounts received by each school district or community college district against any balances of unpaid claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs and interest in chronological order beginning with the earliest claim. The Controller shall report to each school district and community college district the amounts of any claims and interest that are offset from funds provided pursuant to this section and shall report a summary of the amounts offset for each mandate for each fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of the Legislature. The governing board of a school district or community college district may expend funds received pursuant to this section in excess of amounts
 offsetting mandate claims for any other one-time purposes, as determined by the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 724, Sec. 14.   (AB 1610)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.41.

(a) The sum of two hundred fifty-six million dollars ($256,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Controller for allocation to school districts and community college districts for the purpose of offsetting the 2006–07 fiscal year and 2009–10 fiscal year outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(1) The amount appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 41203.1, in accordance with the following:

(A) Eighty-two million four hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars ($82,467,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section A of the State Schools Fund for allocation by the Superintendent pursuant to this section.

(B) Twenty-seven million nine hundred eighty-one thousand dollars ($27,981,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community colleges districts pursuant to this section.

(C) One hundred forty-five million five hundred fifty-two thousand dollars ($145,552,000) for transfer by the Controller to the School Facilities Emergency Repair Account pursuant to Section 17592.71.

(2) The amount allocated to school districts pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (1) shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per unit of regular average daily attendance, as those average daily attendance numbers are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(3) The amount allocated to community college districts pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per enrolled full-time equivalent student, as those numbers of students are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision a school district includes a county office of education and a charter school.

(b) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amounts appropriated and allocated pursuant to this section shall be applied to the
 outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred in accordance with the following:

(1) Two hundred eleven million five hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($211,533,000) in payment of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation for the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(2) Forty-four million four hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars ($44,467,000) in payment of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation for the 2009–10 fiscal year.

(c) Funding received by school districts and community college districts pursuant to
 subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall first be deemed to be paid in satisfaction of any outstanding claims pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs for any fiscal year. Notwithstanding Section 12419.5 of the Government Code and any amounts that are deemed, pursuant to this subdivision, to be paid in satisfaction of outstanding claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs, the Controller may audit any claim as allowed by law and may recover any amount owed by school districts and community college districts pursuant to an audit only by reducing amounts owed for any other mandate claims. Under no circumstances shall a school district or community college district be required to remit funding back to the state to pay for disallowed costs identified by a Controller audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs. The Controller shall not recover any amount
 owed by a school district or community college district pursuant to an audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs by reducing any amount owed a school district or community college district for any purpose other than amounts owed for any other mandate claims. The Controller shall apply amounts received by each school district or community college district against any balances of unpaid claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local costs and interest in chronological order beginning with the earliest claim. The Controller shall report to each school district and community college district the amounts of any claims and interest that are offset from funds provided pursuant to this section and shall report a summary of the amounts offset for each mandate for each fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(d) (1) The governing board of a school district or
 community college district may expend the one-time funds received pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for any purpose, as determined by the governing board.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts will prioritize the use of these one-time funds for professional development, induction for beginning teachers with a focus on relevant mentoring, instructional materials, technology infrastructure, and any other investments necessary to support implementation of the common core standards in English language arts and mathematics, the implementation of English language development standards, and the implementation of the Next Generation Science standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 21.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.42.

(a) (1) The sum of two hundred eighteen million dollars ($218,000,000) is hereby appropriated in the 2016–17 fiscal year from the General Fund for allocation to school districts and community college districts for the purpose of offsetting the 2009–10 fiscal year outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) The amount appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 41203.1, in accordance with the following:

(A) One hundred ninety-four million one hundred seventy-three thousand dollars ($194,173,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation by the Superintendent pursuant to this section.

(B) Twenty-three million eight hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars ($23,827,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community colleges districts for deferred maintenance, instructional materials, and other activities, as specified in Provision 20 of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2016.

(3) The amount allocated to school districts pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per unit of regular average daily attendance, as those
 average daily attendance numbers are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(4) The amount allocated to community college districts pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per enrolled full-time equivalent student, as those numbers of students are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(5) For purposes of this section, a school district includes a county office of education and a charter school.

(b) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amounts appropriated and allocated pursuant to this section shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts
 pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2009–10 fiscal year and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(c) Funding received by school districts pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall first be deemed to be paid in satisfaction of any outstanding claims pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs for any fiscal year. Notwithstanding Section 12419.5 of the Government Code and any amounts that are deemed pursuant to this subdivision to be paid in satisfaction of outstanding claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs, the Controller may audit any claim as allowed by law and may recover any amount owed by school districts pursuant to an audit
 only by reducing amounts owed for any other mandate claims. Under no circumstances shall a school district be required to remit funding back to the state to pay for disallowed costs identified by a Controller audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs. The Controller shall not recover any amount owed by a school district pursuant to an audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs by reducing any amount owed a school district for any purpose other than amounts owed for any other mandate claims. The Controller shall apply amounts received by each school district against any balances of unpaid claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs and interest in chronological order, beginning with the earliest claim. The Controller shall report to each school district the amounts of any claims and interest that are offset from funds provided pursuant to this section and shall report a summary of the amounts offset for each mandate for each fiscal year to the
 Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(d) (1) The governing board of a school district may expend the one-time funds received pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for any purpose, as determined by the governing board of the school district.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts prioritize the use of these one-time funds for deferred maintenance, professional development for educators, induction for beginning teachers with a focus on relevant mentoring, instructional materials, technology infrastructure, and any other investments necessary to support implementation of California’s academic standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 29, Sec. 8.   (SB 828)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.43.

(a) (1) The sum of eighty-nine million six hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($89,637,000) is hereby appropriated in the 2017–18 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Controller for allocation to school districts and community college districts for the purpose of reducing the 2009–10 fiscal year outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) The amount appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 41203.1, in accordance with the following:

(A) Eighty-six million three hundred twenty thousand dollars ($86,320,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts for support of the California Community College Guided Pathways Grant Program pursuant to Part 54.81 (commencing with Section 88920) of Division 7 of Title 3.

(B) Three million three hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($3,317,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program pursuant to Section 53070.

(b) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amounts appropriated and allocated pursuant to this section
 shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2009–10 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 25.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.44.

If the Superintendent and the Director of Finance jointly determine that, for the 2016–17 fiscal year, the state has applied moneys for the support of school districts and community college districts in an amount that exceeds the minimum amount required for the 2016–17 fiscal year pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the excess, up to five hundred thirteen million six hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($513,643,000) shall be deemed, as of June 30, 2017, a payment in satisfaction of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2009–10 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 26.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.45.

(a) (1) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is hereby appropriated in the 2018–19 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Controller for allocation to school districts and community college districts for the purpose of reducing the 2009–10 fiscal year outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(2) The amount appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 41203.1, in accordance with the following:

(A) Eighty-nine million
 seventy thousand dollars ($89,070,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation by the Superintendent pursuant to this section.

(B) Ten million nine hundred thirty thousand dollars ($10,930,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts for deferred maintenance, instructional materials, and other activities, as specified in Provision 22 of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.0 of the Budget Act of 2018.

(3) The amount allocated to school districts pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per unit of average daily attendance, as those average daily attendance numbers are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment of the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(4) The amount allocated to community college districts pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall be distributed on the basis of an equal amount per enrolled full-time equivalent student, as those numbers of students are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(5) For purposes of this section, a school district includes a county office of education and a charter school.

(b) (1) If a school district is required to repay claims disallowed under the School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities or Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option programs for the 2009–10 to 2015–16 fiscal years, inclusive, the Controller shall, upon notification from the Department of Finance, withhold up to the specified amounts owed by the applicable school
 districts from the allocations made to those school districts pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) The Controller shall transfer the amounts withheld pursuant to paragraph (1) to the General Fund as reimbursement of the payments made by the state in the 2017–18 and the 2018–19 fiscal years to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services on behalf of those school districts.

(c) Funding received by school districts pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), less any amount withheld pursuant to subdivision (b), shall first be deemed to be paid in satisfaction of any outstanding claims pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII   B of the California Constitution for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs for any fiscal year. Notwithstanding Section 12419.5 of the Government Code and any amounts that are deemed,
 pursuant to this subdivision, to be paid in satisfaction of outstanding claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs, the Controller may audit any claim as allowed by law and may recover any amount owed by school districts pursuant to an audit only by reducing amounts owed for any other mandate claims. Under no circumstances shall a school district be required to remit funding back to the state to pay for disallowed costs identified by a Controller audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs. The Controller shall not recover any amount owed by a school district pursuant to an audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs by reducing any amount owed to a school district or community college district for any purpose other than amounts owed for any other mandate claims. The Controller shall apply amounts received by each school district against any balances of unpaid claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs and interest in
 chronological order beginning with the earliest claim. The Controller shall report to each school district the amounts of any claims and interest that are offset from funds provided pursuant to this section and shall report a summary of the amounts offset for each mandate for each fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature.

(d) (1) The governing board of a school district may expend the one-time funds received pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for any purpose, as determined by the governing board.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts prioritize the use of these one-time funds for professional development, induction for beginning teachers with a focus on relevant mentoring, instructional materials, technology infrastructure, employee benefits, and
 any other investments necessary to support implementation of the common core academic content standards in English language arts and mathematics, the implementation of English language development standards, and the implementation of the Next Generation Science standards.

(e) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amounts appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2009–10 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 48.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.46.

If the Director of Finance determines that, for the 2018–19 fiscal year, the state has applied moneys for the support of school districts and community college districts in an amount that exceeds the minimum funding obligation required for the 2018–19 fiscal year pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the excess, up to three hundred sixty-eight million three hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($368,355,000), shall be deemed, as of June 30, 2019, a payment in satisfaction of the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2009–10 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 23.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.47.

(a) (1) The sum of two hundred sixty-six million three hundred six thousand dollars ($266,306,000) is hereby appropriated in the 2019–20 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Controller for allocation to school districts and community colleges for purposes of reducing the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2009–10, 2011–12, 2013–14, 2014–15, and 2016–17 fiscal years.

(2) The amount appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be allocated to school districts and community college districts, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 41203.1, in accordance with the following:

(A) Ninety-eight million four hundred fifty-four thousand dollars ($98,454,000) to the Controller for allocation by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(B) Thirteen million four hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($13,486,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts for deferred maintenance, instructional materials, and other activities, as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Provision 22 of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2018 (Chapter 29 of the Statutes of 2018 (Senate Bill 840 of the 2017–18 Regular Session)). These funds shall be available for one-time use until June 30, 2021.

(C) Four hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars ($438,000) for transfer by the
 Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts for the California Community Colleges Strong Workforce Program, as specified in subdivision (b) of Provision 13 of Item 6870-101-001 of the Budget Act of 2018.

(D) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to support expansion of veteran resource centers at the following community colleges, provided that the colleges commit to meeting or making progress towards meeting the minimum standards developed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges:

(i) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) shall be allocated to MiraCosta College.

(ii) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to Norco College.

(E) Two million four hundred thousand dollars ($2,400,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to support the creation of a basic needs and veteran resource center at Sacramento City College.

(F) Four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to support the improvement of workforce development programs at the following colleges:

(i) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to Modesto Junior College.

(ii) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to Bakersfield College.

(iii) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to Fresno City College.

(iv) One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to San Bernardino Valley College.

(v) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be allocated to Norco College.

(G) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to support startup funds to implement a construction trades program in the Counties of Lake and Mendocino at Mendocino College.

(H) Three million nine hundred thousand dollars ($3,900,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community colleges to address student hunger needs pursuant to Section 66027.8 and student basic needs.

(I) Three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to provide support for a one-time reentry grant program.

(J) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to support implementation of the California Community College Teacher Credentialing Partnership Pilot Act pursuant to
 Chapter 603 of the Statutes of 2018 (Senate Bill 577 of the 2017–18 Regular Session).

(K) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts for a systemwide assessment of college-based food programs.

(L) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for allocation by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to Palo Verde College to support the development of a childcare center.

(M) One hundred thirty-three million one hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars ($133,128,000) to the Controller for allocation by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 42238.02 to offset moneys from the General Fund
 paid to the San Francisco Unified School District and San Francisco County Office of Education as a result of a miscalculation of offsetting property tax revenues in the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(b) (1) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), thirty million five hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($30,537,000) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2009–10 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(2) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the
 amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), forty-seven million six hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($47,619,000) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2011–12 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(3) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), one hundred fifty-six million six thousand dollars ($156,006,000) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2013–14 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to
 be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(4) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), thirty-one million five hundred eleven thousand dollars ($31,511,000) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2014–15 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(5) For purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), six hundred thirty-three thousand
 dollars ($633,000) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2016–17 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 110, Sec. 11.   (SB 820)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.48.

(a) The sum of four hundred six million six hundred sixty-four thousand dollars ($406,664,000) is hereby appropriated in the 2019–20 fiscal year from the General Fund to the State School Fund for allocation by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(b) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, three hundred ninety-one million four hundred forty-one thousand dollars ($391,441,000) of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2018–19 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts
 and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2018–19 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, fifteen million two hundred twenty-three thousand dollars ($15,223,000) of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) shall be applied to the outstanding balance of the minimum funding obligation to school districts and community college districts, pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2013–14 fiscal year, and shall be deemed to be appropriations made and allocated in that fiscal year in which the deficiencies resulting in the outstanding balance were incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   (AB 76)   Effective June 26, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.5.

There is hereby established in the General Fund the Proposition 98 Reversion Account. The Legislature shall, from time to time, transfer into the Proposition 98 Reversion Account moneys previously appropriated in satisfaction of the requirements of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution that have not been disbursed or otherwise encumbered for the purposes for which they were appropriated. Moneys that are appropriated in satisfaction of the minimum funding obligation under Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution that would otherwise revert to the unexpended balance of the General Fund shall instead be deposited in the Proposition 98 Reversion Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 899, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

41207.6.

If the Superintendent and the Director of Finance jointly determine that, for the 2011–12 fiscal year, the state has applied moneys for the support of school districts and community college districts in an amount that exceeds the minimum amount required for the 2011–12 fiscal year pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the excess, up to six hundred seventy-one million eight hundred thirty thousand dollars ($671,830,000), shall be deemed, as of June 30, 2012, a payment of the fiscal settlement agreed to by the parties in California Teachers Association, et al. v. Arnold Schwarzenegger (Case Number 05CS01165 of the Superior Court for the County of Sacramento) and Chapter 213 of the Statutes of 2004 for the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years, as determined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 41207.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 45.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41208.

To ensure that the changes to average daily attendance resulting from the revision of the calculation of apportionments for high school pupils concurrently enrolled in adult education pursuant to Assembly Bill 1891 of the 1991-92 Regular Session do not result in unintended reductions to the minimum funding guarantee established by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the following shall be used to determine the average daily attendance computed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14022.3, for the purpose of determining “changes in enrollment” for the 1992–93 and 1993–94 fiscal years and for subsequent fiscal years pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution:

(a) For the 1992–93 fiscal year, Section 42238.5 is hereby deemed to refer to that section as it existed on July 1, 1992, for the purpose of calculating average daily attendance for both the 1991–92 and 1992–93 fiscal years.

(b) For the 1993–94 fiscal year, Section 42238.5 is hereby deemed to refer to that section as amended by Assembly Bill 1891 of the 1991–92 Regular Session for the purposes of calculating the average daily attendance for both the 1992–93 and 1993–94 fiscal years.

(c) For the 1994–95 and each fiscal year thereafter, Section 42238.5 is hereby deemed to refer to that section as amended by Assembly Bill 1891 of the 1991–92 Regular Session for the purposes of calculating the average daily attendance for both the prior and current fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1195, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41210.

(a) The revenues transferred pursuant to Sections 6051.15 and 6201.15 of the Revenue and Taxation Code are not “General Fund revenues” as that term is used in Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) This section shall be operative for the 2011–12 fiscal year and subsequent years so long as one or more ballot measures approved before November 17, 2012, authorize the determination in subdivision (a) and provide funding for school districts and community college districts in an amount equal to that which would have been provided if the revenues referenced in subdivision (a) were General Fund revenues for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California
 Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   (AB 32 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Section operative for 2011-12 fiscal year, and subsequent years subject to condition in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

41211.

The following shall apply if Section 41210 is rendered inoperative because the ballot measure or measures described in subdivision (b) of that section are not approved:
